Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4003
Applicability.

The Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney
Act applies to all powers of attorney except:

(1) A power to the extent
it is coupled with an interest in the subject of the power, including a power
given to or for the benefit of a creditor in connection with a credit transaction;

(2) A power to make health
care decisions;

(3)
A proxy or other delegation to exercise voting rights or management rights
with respect to an entity; and

(4) A power created on a form prescribed by a government
or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality for a governmental
purpose.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 3.